Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1836
Person convicted of crime; payments received; deposited in fund.

Every person, firm, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, association, or other legal entity contracting with any person or the representative or assignee of any person accused of a crime in this state with respect to the reenactment of such crime, by way of a movie, book, magazine article, radio, or television presentation, live entertainment of any kind, or from the expression of such person's thoughts, feelings, opinions, or emotions regarding such crime, shall pay over to the committee any money which would otherwise, by terms of such contract, be owing to the person so convicted or his or her representatives. The committee shall deposit such money in the Victim's Compensation Fund.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 36;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 34;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 544.